Louisiana, session 2026, HB411.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:32(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§32. Rates of tax
A. On individuals. (1) The For taxable years beginning before January 1,
2028, the tax to be assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of
an individual shall be computed at the rate of three percent on net income.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2028, through December 31, 2028, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of two and nine-tenths percent on net income.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2029, through December 31, 2029, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of two and eight-tenths percent on net income.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2030, through December 31, 2030, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of two and seven-tenths percent on net income.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 411
(5) Beginning January 1, 2031, through December 31, 2031, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of two and six-tenths percent on net income.
(6) Beginning January 1, 2032, through December 31, 2032, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of two percent on net income.
(7) Beginning January 1, 2033, through December 31, 2033, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of one and seventy-five hundredths percent on net income.
(8) Beginning January 1, 2034, through December 31, 2034, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of one and five-tenths percent on net income.
(9) Beginning January 1, 2035, through December 31, 2035, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of one and twenty-five hundredths percent on net income.
(10) Beginning January 1, 2036, through December 31, 2036, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of one percent on net income.
(11) Beginning January 1, 2037, through December 31, 2037, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of seventy-five hundredths of one percent on net income.
(12) Beginning January 1, 2038, through December 31, 2038, the tax to be
assessed, levied, collected, and paid upon the taxable income of an individual shall
be computed at the rate of twenty-five hundredths of one percent on net income.
(13) Beginning January 1, 2039, and thereafter, no tax shall be assessed,
levied, collected, or paid upon the net income of an individual.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 411
Section 2. This Act shall be known and referenced as "The Pelican Promise: Zero
in Ten Income Tax Freedom Act".
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable periods
beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.